California, session 20252026, SB598.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 4.9 (commencing with Section 22199.5) is added to Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, to read: CHAPTER 4.9. Construction Manager/General Contractor Project Delivery Program22199.5. As used in this chapter:(a) “Best value” means a value determined by evaluation of objective criteria that relate to price, features, functions, life-cycle costs, experience, and past performance. A best value determination may involve the selection of the lowest cost proposal meeting the interests of the local agency and meeting the objectives of the project.(b) “Construction manager” means a partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that is a licensed contractor pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code and that is able to provide appropriately licensed contracting and engineering services as needed pursuant to a Construction Manager/General Contractor method contract.(c) “Construction Manager/General Contractor method” means a project delivery method in which a construction manager is procured to provide preconstruction services during the design phase of the project and construction services during the construction phase of the project. The contract for construction services may be entered into at the same time as the contract for preconstruction services or at a later time. The execution of the design and the construction of the project may be in sequential phases or concurrent phases.(d) “Local agency” means a city, county, city and county, or special district authorized by law to provide for the production, storage, supply, treatment, or distribution of any water from any source.(e) “Preconstruction services” means advice during the design phase, including, but not limited to, scheduling, pricing, and phasing to assist the local agency to design a more constructible project.(f) “Project” means a public work necessary for the construction of a recycled water facility or infrastructure designed specifically to alleviate water shortages attributable to drought, climate change, or other environmental factors.22199.6. (a) Upon approval by its governing body, a local agency may use, in addition to other methods of project delivery otherwise allowable by law, the Construction Manager/General Contractor method of project delivery for a regional recycled water project or other water infrastructure project undertaken to alleviate water supply shortages attributable to drought or climate change. The local agency shall follow the procedures described in Sections 21568.5 to 21568.10, inclusive.(b) The authorization under this section shall apply to no more than 15 capital outlay projects for each local agency.(c) A local agency shall award a contract pursuant to this section on a best value basis or to the lowest responsible bidder.(d) (1) The provisions of this chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date are inoperative.(2) A contract awarded pursuant to this chapter before it becomes inoperative, but after Sections 21568.5 to 21568.10, inclusive, become inoperative pursuant to Section 21568.11, shall continue in full force and effect until completion, including any subsequently executed changes to the contract, or termination.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.